test/src/morphology/N-ehitues18_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ehitüs: # Noun (18) ehitüs 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Nom: ehitüs
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Gen: ehitüse
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Par: ehitüst
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Ill: ehitüste
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Gen: [ehitüisi, ehitüste]
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Par: ehitüisi
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Ill: ehitüisihe
     ehitüs+N+Pl+All: [ehitüisile, ehitüstele]
